Illinois, session 104th, SB1418.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 18356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 19356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 20356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, 356z.77, and 356z.80 21of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 22must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 23370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance   SB1418 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 2coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 3Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 4Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 5Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 6enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 7Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 8other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 9Department of Central Management Services.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 19eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 248-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   SB1418 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)5    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 6including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 7of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 8coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 9benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 10health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 11under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 12356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 13356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 14356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 15356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 16356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 17356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 18356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 19The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 20356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 22Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 23provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 24the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII,   SB1418 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 2rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 3every provision of this Section. 4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 121-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 13eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 14102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 151-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 16eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 187-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 19eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 20revised 11-26-24.) 21    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)24    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a   SB1418 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 2self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 3coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 4coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 7356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 8356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 9356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 10356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 11356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 13356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, 14and 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 15comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the 16Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 17enforce the requirements of this Section. The requirement that 18health benefits be covered as provided in this is an exclusive 19power and function of the State and is a denial and limitation 20under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois 21Constitution. A home rule municipality to which this Section 22applies must comply with every provision of this Section. 23    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 24any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 25with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 26Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   SB1418 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 81-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 12eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1510-22.3f as follows: 16    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)17    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 18protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 19post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 20policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 21the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 22356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 23356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 24356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32,   SB1418 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 2356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 3356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 4356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.77, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 5Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 6356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 7comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois 8Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 9requirements of this Section. 10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 20102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 211-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 23103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 247-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, 25eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)   SB1418 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1    Section 22. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 2adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)4    Sec. 356z.80. Coverage for peripheral artery disease 5screening test. A group or individual plan of accident and 6health insurance or managed care plan amended, delivered, 7issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide 8medically necessary coverage for a peripheral artery disease 9screening test for any at-risk individual, as defined by the 10American College of Cardiology and the American Heart 11Association's Joint Committee on Clinical Practice Guidelines.  12    Section 25. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 13amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 14    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)15    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)16    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 17    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 18the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 19141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 20152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 21155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 22356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 23356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10,   SB1418 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 2356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 3356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 4356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 5356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 6356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 7356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 8356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 9356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 10356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 11368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 12408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 13subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 14XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 15Illinois Insurance Code.16    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 17for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 18Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 19are deemed to be "domestic companies":20        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 21    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;22        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 23    State; or24        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 25    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 26    of this State, except a corporation subject to   SB1418 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1    substantially the same requirements in its state of 2    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 3    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.4    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 5acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 6pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,7        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 8    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 9    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 10    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 11    acquisition of control takes effect;12        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 13    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 14    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 15    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 16    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 17    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 18    other acquisition of control;19        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 20    following information:21            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 22        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 23        Organization sought to be acquired;24            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 25        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 26        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be   SB1418 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 2        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 3        forma financial statements reflecting projected 4        combined operation for a period of 2 years;5            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 6        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 7        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 8        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and9            (D) such other information as the Director shall 10        require.11    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 12Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 13any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 14enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 15maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 16to its health care certificates).17    (e) In considering any management contract or service 18agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 19Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 20specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 21take into account the effect of the management contract or 22service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 23and the financial condition of the health maintenance 24organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 25into account the effect of the management contract or service 26agreement on competition.  SB1418 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 2Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 3Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 4defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 5Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 6group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 7additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:8        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 9    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 10    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 11    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 12    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 13    not be less than one year); and14        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 15    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 16    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 17    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 18    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 19    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 20    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 21    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 22    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 23    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 24    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 25    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 26    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into   SB1418 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 2    plan years.3    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 4statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 5describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 6and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 7the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 8to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 9profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 10unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 11or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 12experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 13the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 14enrollment unit.15    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 16Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 17contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 18refund authorized under this Section.19    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 20if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 21accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 22Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 23Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 24adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 25(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 26102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff.   SB1418 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b11-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 2eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 3102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 41-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 5eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 76-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 8eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 9103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 101-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 11eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 12103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 131-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 14    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)15    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 16    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 17the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 18141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 19152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 20155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 21356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 22356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 23356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 24356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 25356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32,   SB1418 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 2356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 3356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 4356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 5356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 6356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 7356z.77, 356z.80, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 8368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 9403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 10of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 11XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 12Illinois Insurance Code.13    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 14for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 15Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 16are deemed to be "domestic companies":17        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 18    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;19        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 20    State; or21        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 22    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 23    of this State, except a corporation subject to 24    substantially the same requirements in its state of 25    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 26    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.  SB1418 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 2acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 3pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,4        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 5    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 6    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 7    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 8    acquisition of control takes effect;9        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 10    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 11    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 12    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 13    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 14    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 15    other acquisition of control;16        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 17    following information:18            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 19        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 20        Organization sought to be acquired;21            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 22        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 23        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 24        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 25        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 26        forma financial statements reflecting projected   SB1418 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1        combined operation for a period of 2 years;2            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 3        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 4        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 5        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and6            (D) such other information as the Director shall 7        require.8    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 9Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 10any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 11enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 12maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 13to its health care certificates).14    (e) In considering any management contract or service 15agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 16Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 17specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 18take into account the effect of the management contract or 19service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 20and the financial condition of the health maintenance 21organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 22into account the effect of the management contract or service 23agreement on competition.24    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 25Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 26Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as   SB1418 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 2Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 3group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 4additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:5        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 6    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 7    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 8    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 9    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 10    not be less than one year); and11        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 12    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 13    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 14    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 15    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 16    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 17    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 18    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 19    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 20    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 21    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 22    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 23    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 24    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 25    plan years.26    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a   SB1418 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 2describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 3and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 4the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 5to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 6profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 7unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 8or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 9experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 10the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 11enrollment unit.12    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 13Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 14contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 15refund authorized under this Section.16    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 17if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 18accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 19Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 20Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 21adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 22(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 23102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 241-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 25eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 26102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff.   SB1418 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b11-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 2eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 3103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 46-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 5eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 6103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 71-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 8eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 101-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 1111-26-24.) 12    Section 30. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 13amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 14    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)15    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 16health service organizations shall be subject to the 17provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 18141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 19154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 20355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 21356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 22356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 23356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 24356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.80, 364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1,   SB1418 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 2Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 3XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 4shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 5that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 6Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 7Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 8organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 9domestic companies:10        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or11        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 12    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 13    of this State, except a corporation subject to 14    substantially the same requirements in its state of 15    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 16    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 191-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 20eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 21102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 221-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 23eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 24103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 257-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 26eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)   SB1418 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1    Section 35. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 2amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)4    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 5services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 6or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 7Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 8143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 9355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 10356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 11356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 12356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18, 13356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 14356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.46, 15356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 16356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 17356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.80, 364.01, 364.3, 18367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 19and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois 20Insurance Code.21    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 22any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 23with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 24Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   SB1418 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 510-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 7102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 81-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 111-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 12eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 13103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 141-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 15    Section 40. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 16changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 17    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)18    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 19assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 20benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 21health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 22under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 23356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 24356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64,   SB1418 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1and 356z.67, and 356z.71, 356z.75, and 356z.80 of the Illinois 2Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the provisions of Sections 3356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the 4Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be subject to the 5provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of the Network 6Adequacy and Transparency Act.7    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 8the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 9Code. 10    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 11rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 12any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 13of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 14with Section 5-5e. 15    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 16Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 17ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 18post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 19no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 20(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 21102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-530, eff. 221-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, 23eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 24102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 251-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, 26eff. 1-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25;   SB1418 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 06136 BAB 16169 b1revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 3changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 4that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 5represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 6not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 7made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 8Public Act.